Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB542.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The General Assembly finds and declares that:(1) The Commonwealth has a compelling governmental 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 interest to protect the integrity of the government from actual corruption or the appearance of corruption.(2) When people, associations or other entities, including foreign corporations and foreign-influenced corporations, provide unlimited monetary support for elected government officials or candidates who are seeking governmental offices, there arises the appearance of corruption.(3) The appearance of corruption and actual corruption can be prevented by requiring transparency and regulating the contributions that can be made to elected government officials and candidates who are seeking governmental offices.Section 2. Section 201 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 201. Powers and Duties of the Secretary of the Commonwealth.--The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall exercise in the manner provided by this act all powers granted to him by this act, and shall perform all the duties imposed upon him by this act, which shall include the following:* * *(i) To biennially adjust the limitations on contributions under section 1627.1(s).Section 3. Section 1621(d), (e) and (f) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1621. Definitions.--As used in this article, the following words have the following meanings:* * *20250HB0542PN0538 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) The word "expenditure" shall mean any of the following:(1) The payment, distribution, loan or advancement of money or any valuable thing by a candidate, candidate committee, political committee, political action committee, political party committee or other person for the purpose of influencing the outcome of a nomination or an election[;]: provided, however, that the payment, distribution, loan or advancement of money or any valuable thing shall be made only for expenses directly and exclusively incurred for the campaign in which the candidate is running in the contemporaneous election cycle and that no expenditure of funds from campaign accounts shall be used for any personal purpose.(2) The payment, distribution, loan, advance or transfer of money or other valuable thing between or among political committees[;].(3) The providing of a service or other valuable thing for the purpose of influencing the outcome of a nomination or election of any person to any public office to be voted for in this Commonwealth[; or].(4) The payment or providing of money or other valuable thing by any person other than a candidate or political committee, to compensate any person for services rendered to a candidate or political committee.(e) The words "independent expenditure" shall mean an expenditure by a person, other than a political committee or candidate, expressly advocating the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate for nomination or election or promoting the success or defeat of a clearly identified ballot question appearing on the ballot in each election district in this Commonwealth, made for the purpose of influencing an 20250HB0542PN0538 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 election without cooperation or consultation with any candidate or any political committee authorized by that candidate and which is not made in concert with or at the request or suggestion of any candidate or political committee or agent thereof.(f) The word "lobbyist" shall mean any person who is registered pursuant to the provisions of [the act of September 30, 1961 (P.L.1778, No.712), known as the "Lobbying Registration and Regulation Act."] 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 13A (relating to lobbying disclosure).* * *(n) The word "affiliate" shall include:(1) Any committee established or authorized by a candidate as part of his or her campaign for a specific campaign for a designated office.(2) Any committee established, financed, maintained or controlled by the same corporation, labor organization, membership association, not-for-profit organization or trade or professional association, person or group of persons, including any parent, subsidiary, branch, division, department or local unit of an entity under this paragraph. Local units may include, in appropriate cases, a franchisee, licensee or regional association.(o) The words "chief executive officer" shall mean the highest ranking officer or decision-making individual with authority over a corporation's affairs.(p) The words "clearly identified" shall mean:(1) with respect to a candidate, the name of the candidate appears;(2) with respect to a candidate, a photograph, drawing or 20250HB0542PN0538 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other image of the candidate appears; or(3) with respect to a candidate or ballot question, the identity of the candidate or ballot question is apparent by unambiguous reference.(q) The words "electioneering communication" shall mean a broadcast, cable, mail, satellite, the Internet, social media or print communication by a person, other than a political committee or candidate, that refers to a clearly identified candidate or clearly identified ballot question appearing on the ballot in each election district in this Commonwealth and is publicly distributed within ninety (90) days before an election in which the candidate is seeking election or reelection or the ballot question appears on the ballot. The term does not include any of the following communications:(1) A communication that is disseminated through a means other than a broadcast station, radio station, cable television system, telecommunications, Internet or satellite system, newspaper, magazine, periodical, billboard advertisement or mail.(2) A communication to less than one hundred (100) recipients.(3) A news story, commentary, letter to the editor, news release, column, op-ed or editorial broadcast by a television station, radio station, cable television system or satellite system or printed in a newspaper, magazine or other periodical in general circulation.(4) Expenditures or independent expenditures or contributions that must otherwise be reported under this article.(5) A communication from a membership organization 20250HB0542PN0538 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exclusively to its members and their families, otherwise known as a membership communication.(6) Bona fide candidate debates or forums and advertising or promotion of the same.(r) The words "electioneering communication expenditure" shall mean any expenditure made by a person, other than a political committee or a candidate, as payment for an electioneering communication.(s) The words "foreign-influenced corporation" shall mean a corporation for which:(1) a foreign owner holds, owns, controls or otherwise has directly or indirectly acquired beneficial ownership of equity or voting shares in an amount that is equal to or greater than five (5) per cent of the total equity or outstanding voting shares; or(2) foreign owners hold, own, control or have directly or indirectly acquired beneficial ownership of equity or voting shares in an amount that is equal to or greater than twenty (20) per cent of the total equity or outstanding voting shares.(t) The words "foreign national" shall mean:(1) a foreign principal; or(2) an individual who is not a citizen of the United States or a national of the United States and who is not lawfully admitted for permanent residence.(u) The words "foreign owner" shall mean a foreign national or a corporation wherein a foreign national holds, owns, controls or otherwise has directly or indirectly acquired beneficial ownership of equity or voting shares in an amount that is equal to or greater than fifty (50) per cent of the total equity or outstanding voting shares.20250HB0542PN0538 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) The words "foreign principal" shall mean:(1) a government of a foreign country;(2) a foreign political party; or(3) a partnership, association, corporation, organization or other combination of persons organized under the laws of or having its principal place of business in a foreign country.(w) The words "independent expenditure political action committee" shall mean a political action committee that only receives contributions to make independent expenditures.(x) The words "in-kind contribution" shall mean a contribution of goods, services, property or any valuable thing offered free or at less than the fair market value for the goods, property or services. The words shall not include any legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of any political committee of a political party, an authorized committee of a candidate or any other political committee, if the services are solely for the purpose of ensuring compliance with this article. The legal or accounting services shall be reported under section 1626.(y) The words "personal purpose" shall mean a purpose that, by its nature, confers a personal benefit, including expenditures such as a home mortgage, home rent, utility payment, clothing purchase, noncampaign automobile expense, country club membership, vacation or a trip of a noncampaign nature, household food items, tuition payments, admission to a sporting event, concert, theater or other form of entertainment and other expenditures not specifically and directly necessary for the conduct of the campaign.(z) The word "person" shall include any corporation, partnership, limited liability company, business trust, other 20250HB0542PN0538 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 association, government entity, other than the Commonwealth, estate, trust, foundation or natural person.Section 4. Sections 1622(b) and 1624(b) of the act are amended to read:Section 1622. Organization of Political Committees; Treasurer and Assistant Treasurer; Records of Candidate and Committees.--* * *(b) Every candidate who authorizes a committee [or committees], to receive and disburse funds on behalf of this candidacy, shall name a sole treasurer[, irrespective of the number of committees so authorized,] to receive and disburse all funds [for] of said [committees. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit a candidate from receiving or expending moneys on his behalf or a treasurer of a political party committee or a committee authorized to receive and distribute funds on behalf of more than one (1) candidate from receiving or expending moneys on behalf of said candidates, notwithstanding the appointment of a sole treasurer. A sole treasurer may delegate authority, in writing, to any number of assistant treasurers to receive and disburse moneys collected on behalf of a candidate for election. Nothing in this section shall prohibit authorized individuals from selling tickets or soliciting funds when funds are deposited in the campaign account of the candidate.] committee.* * *Section 1624. Registration.--* * *(b) Each registration statement shall contain the following information:20250HB0542PN0538 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The name, addresses and phone numbers of the political committee.(2) The name, address and phone number of the committee's treasurer.(3) The name, address and phone number of the committee's chairman.(4) The names, addresses and relationships of other affiliated or connected organizations.(5) The candidates, if any, and their names and addresses.(6) The ballot question, if any, which the committee intends to support or oppose.(7) The banks, safety deposit boxes or other repositories and their addresses used by the committee.(8) The proposed period of operation of the committee.(9) A political committee which is established, financed, maintained or controlled by a sponsoring organization such as a corporation, labor organization, membership association, not-for-profit organization or trade or professional association shall include in its registered name the full name of its sponsoring organization.* * *Section 5. Section 1626(a), (b), (c), (d) and (g) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1626. Reporting by Candidate and Political Committees and other Persons.--(a) Each treasurer of a political committee and each candidate for election to public office shall file with the appropriate supervisor reports of receipts and expenditures on forms, designed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, if the 20250HB0542PN0538 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amount received or expended or liabilities incurred shall exceed the sum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250). Should such an amount not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250), then the candidate or, in the case of a political committee, the treasurer of the committee shall file a sworn statement to that effect with the appropriate supervisor rather than the report required by this section[.]: provided, however, that if the amount received or expended by a candidate does not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) he or she may comply with this section by signing an affidavit to that effect on his or her political committee's report or statement.(b) Each report shall include the following information:(1) The full name, mailing address, specific occupation and specific name of the employer, if any, or the principal place of business, if self-employed, of each person who has made one or more contributions to or for such committee or candidate within the reporting period in an aggregate amount or value in excess of [two hundred fifty dollars ($250)] one hundred dollars ($100), together with the amount and date of such contributions. The accuracy of the information furnished to the candidate or committee shall be the responsibility of the contributor.(2) The full name and mailing address of each person [who] and political committee that has made one or more contributions to or for such committee or candidate within the reporting period in an aggregate amount or value in excess of fifty dollars ($50), together with the amount and date of such contributions. The accuracy of the information furnished by the contributor shall be the responsibility of the contributor.(3) The total sum of individual contributions made to or for such committee or candidate during the reporting period and not 20250HB0542PN0538 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reported under clauses (1) and (2).(4) Each and every expenditure, the date made, the full name and address of the person to whom made and the purpose for which such expenditure was made. If the creditor is a credit card company or similar instrumentality that is an intermediary for collecting payments due, it shall not be sufficient to list the name of the collecting organization. The report shall identify the credit card company and also the specific entities and payments being paid through the credit card company or like e ntity. If the payment is being made by a committee to a creditor for expenses on behalf of one or more candidates, the amounts of payments and purposes of the payments shall be broken down to identify each candidate's share of the incurred expenses. The report shall include copies of the political committee's or candidate's itemized credit card statements displaying the reportable expenditures included in the report.(5) Any unpaid debts and liabilities, with the nature and amount of each, the date incurred and the full name and address of the person owed.(6) The account shall include any unexpended balance of contributions or other receipts appearing from the last account filed.(7) Identification of political committees as follows:(i) If the contributor is a political committee, the official registration number of the committee must be included on the contribution check or, in the case of an electronic transfer, within the documentation sent to the candidate providing notice to the electronic transfer of funds.(ii) The official registration number of the committee shall be included on the disclosure report filed by the committee.20250HB0542PN0538 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The official committee registration number shall be included on each entry for that committee on a candidate's disclosure report.(c) [Vouchers or copies of vouchers for all sums expended amounting to more than twenty-five dollars ($25) shall be retained by the candidate or the committee treasurer and shall be available for public inspection and copying as herein provided. Any person may inspect or copy such vouchers or copies thereof by filing a written request with the appropriate supervisory office which shall notify the candidate or political committee of such request. The candidate or political committee shall have the option of either forwarding such vouchers or copy of the same to the supervisor for such purpose or making the vouchers or copy of the same available to the requesting person. If a candidate or a treasurer of a political committee shall fail to make said vouchers or copies thereof available for inspection and copying when requested by the appropriate supervisory officer, such officer shall direct the candidate or political committee to promptly deliver the vouchers or copies thereof to the supervisory office for purposes of inspection and copying. Costs of copying and costs of delivery by the candidate or treasurer of the requested vouchers or copies thereof shall be borne by the person requesting same.] (1) Vouchers or copies of vouchers for all sums expended amounting to more than twenty-five dollars ($25) shall be retained by the candidate or the political committee treasurer for a period of three (3) years as required under section 1622(c) and shall be available for public inspection and copying.(2) Any person may inspect or copy such vouchers or copies thereof by filing a written request with the appropriate 20250HB0542PN0538 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 supervisory office which shall notify the candidate or political committee of the request. The candidate or political committee shall forward the vouchers or copy of the same to the supervisor for such purpose within fifteen (15) days of the date of the request. The supervisor shall make the vouchers or copies of the vouchers available to the requesting person for inspection and copying. Costs of copying and costs of delivery by the candidate or treasurer of the requested vouchers or copies shall be borne by the requesting person.(3) If a candidate or a treasurer of a political committee fails to forward the vouchers or copies of the vouchers to the supervisory office when requested, the supervisory office shall provide written notice of the violation to the candidate or political committee. If the violation is not corrected within thirty (30) days after receipt of a notice, the department shall issue a notice of violation and, after a hearing, make a determination and may assess penalties against the candidate or treasurer of the political committee for noncompliance under this act.(4) An aggrieved candidate or treasurer of a political committee or requesting person who was party to the department's determination under paragraph (3) may file an action in court seeking declaratory or injunctive relief. In an action under this subsection, the court may allow the prevailing party reasonable attorney fees, including litigation costs and expenses. An action filed under this paragraph must be filed in either:(i) Commonwealth Court in the case of any candidate or treasurer of a candidate's political committee if the candidate is running for a Statewide elected office or a legislative 20250HB0542PN0538 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 office of the General Assembly; or(ii) an appropriate court of common pleas in the case of all other candidates or treasurers of political committees.(5) Prior to granting a request for inspection and copying vouchers, a candidate or political committee may require a requester to prepay an estimate of the fees authorized under this section if the costs of copying and costs of delivery required to fulfill the request are expected to exceed one hundred dollars ($100). If no prepayment is requested or made, a candidate or political committee may require the requestor to pay the actual costs of copying and costs of delivery prior to the release of the requested documents.(6) The Attorney General shall have prosecutorial jurisdiction over a violation committed under this section. The district attorney of any county in which a violation occurred has concurrent powers and responsibilities with the Attorney General over the violations.(7) The supervisor of a candidate or political committee may deny a requesting person access to a voucher or copies of the vouchers if the requesting person has made repeated requests for the same record more than twice and the repeated requests have placed an unreasonable burden on the candidate or political committee, which is substantiated by repeated responses to substantively similar requests. A denial under this paragraph shall not restrict the ability to request a different record.(d) Pre-election reports by candidates for offices to be voted for by the electors of the State at large, candidates for the office of Senator in the General Assembly, candidates for the office of Representative in the General Assembly and all political committees, which have expended money for the purpose 20250HB0542PN0538 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of influencing the election of such [candidate] candidates, shall be filed not later than the sixth Tuesday before and the second Friday before an election, provided that the initial pre-election report shall be complete as of fifty (50) days prior to the election and the subsequent pre-election report shall be complete as of fifteen (15) days prior to the election. Pre-election reports by all other candidates and political committees which have received contributions or made expenditures for the purpose of influencing an election shall be filed not later than the second Friday before an election, provided that such report be complete as of fifteen (15) days prior to the election.(d.1) During nonelection years in which subsection (d) is not operative, an elected official or announced candidate for any elective office shall file quarterly reports if he or she receives more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) during the respective calendar quarter. Reports shall be due thirty (30) days after the end of each calendar quarter and shall be complete through the final day of the calendar quarter the report covers.* * *(g) [Every] Except as provided under section 1644, every person, other than a political committee or candidate, who makes independent expenditures expressly advocating the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate, or question appearing on the ballot, other than by contribution to a political committee or candidate, in an aggregate amount in excess of [one hundred dollars ($100)] one thousand dollars ($1,000) during a calendar year shall file with the appropriate supervisor, on a form prepared by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, a report 20250HB0542PN0538 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which shall include the same information required of a candidate or political committee receiving such a contribution and, additionally, the name of the candidate or question supported or opposed. Reports required by this subsection shall be filed on dates on which reports by political committees making expenditures are required to report under this section.* * *(k) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:The phrase "costs of copying" shall mean up to twenty-five cents (25¢) per copy for black and white copies, and up to fifty cents (50¢) per copy for color copies. If a CD or DVD is provided, the cost of copying will be up to the actual cost of the CD or DVD, not to exceed three dollars ($3) per disc. For a flash drive, the cost of copying will be up to the actual cost of the flash drive.The phrase "costs of delivery" shall mean the cost of postage or shipping of documents from the candidate or committee to the requester. The allowable fee for postage or shipping will be up to the actual cost of the United States Postal Service's first-class postage.The word "department" shall mean the Department of State of the Commonwealth.The word "voucher" shall mean a document that reasonably describes the campaign expense.Section 6. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1627.1. Limitations on Certain Contributions.--(a) Aggregate contributions, including in-kind contributions, from any individual to any candidate for the office of Senator or Representative in the General Assembly, 20250HB0542PN0538 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 judge of a court of common pleas or a county or municipal office, or to the candidate's committee or agent, may not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for each election. For each election, a candidate and the candidate's committee or agent may not accept or receive more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) in aggregate contributions, including in-kind contributions from any individual for each election.(b) Aggregate contributions, including in-kind contributions, from any individual to any candidate for Statewide office, his or her authorized committee or agent, may not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each election. For each election, no candidate, his or her authorized committee or agent may accept or receive more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in aggregate contributions, including in-kind contributions from any individual for each election.(c) For each election, aggregate contributions, including in-kind contributions, from a single political action committee, its affiliate or agent or candidate's political committee, its affiliate or agent to any candidate for Statewide office, the office of Senator or Representative in the General Assembly, judge of a court of common pleas or a county or municipal office, his or her authorized committee or agent, may not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). For each election, no candidate for the office, nor the candidate's committee or agent, may accept or receive more than the applicable amount or amounts as specified under this subsection in aggregate contributions, including in-kind contributions, from a single political action committee or agent or candidate's political committee. A donor shall be an individual or a single committee regardless of the number of contributions made by that individual or committee 20250HB0542PN0538 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 during the election cycle.(d) Contributions from political party committees to a political action committee, other party committee or other committee may not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each election.(e) A candidate for the office of Senator or Representative in the General Assembly, judge of a court of common pleas or a county or municipal office, or the candidate's committee or agent may not accept in excess of two hundred and fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in aggregate contributions, including in-kind contributions from all political party committees, affiliates or agents. Contributions, in the aggregate, received by a candidate, may not exceed the aggregate contributions made by individuals per election.(f) Except for a candidate for the office of Governor, a candidate for Statewide office, his or her authorized committee or agent may not accept in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in aggregate contributions, including in-kind contributions from all political party committees, affiliates or agents. A candidate for Governor, his or her authorized committee or agent may not accept in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in aggregate contributions, including in-kind contributions from all political party committees, affiliates or agents. Contributions in aggregate received by a candidate may not exceed the aggregate contributions made by individuals per election.(g) Aggregate contributions, including in-kind contributions, from any person or single political action committee, its affiliate or agent or any single candidate's political committee, its affiliate or agent to a single 20250HB0542PN0538 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 political action committee, its affiliate or agent, may not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) during any calendar year. For each election, no political action committee, its affiliate or agent may accept or receive more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in aggregate contributions, including in-kind contributions, from any individual person or a single political action committee, its affiliate or agent during any calendar year.(h) Aggregate contributions from any individual, person or single candidate's political committee, its affiliate or agent or a single political action committee, its affiliate or agent or any other political committee to a single political party committee may not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in a calendar year. A single political party committee may not accept or receive more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in aggregate contributions from any individual, person, single candidate's political committee or agent or a single political action committee, its affiliate or agent, any political committee or other committee in a calendar year.(i) The following shall apply to annual aggregate limits:(1) No individual may make contributions to candidates, political committees or other committees that have a combined aggregate amount or value that exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in a calendar year.(2) No political action committee may make contributions to candidates, political committees and party committees in an aggregate amount or value that exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in any calendar year.(j) A gift, subscription, loan, advance or deposit of money or anything of value to a candidate shall be considered a 20250HB0542PN0538 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contribution both by the original source of the contribution and by any intermediary or conduit if the intermediary or conduit:(1) exercises any direction over the making of the contribution; or(2) solicits the contribution or arranges for the contribution to be made and directly or indirectly makes the candidate aware of the intermediary or conduit's role in soliciting or arranging the contribution for the candidate.(k) For purposes of subsection (j), a contribution shall not be considered to be a contribution by an intermediary or conduit to the candidate if any of the following situations occurs:(1) The intermediary or conduit has been retained by the candidate's committee for the purpose of fundraising and is reimbursed for expenses incurred in soliciting contributions.(2) For an individual, the candidate has expressly authorized the intermediary or conduit to engage in fundraising, or the individual occupies a position within the candidate's campaign organization and is authorized by the organization to engage in fundraising.(3) For a political committee, the intermediary or conduit is the authorized committee of the candidate.(l) The following shall apply to out-of-State contributions:(1) A candidate, candidate committee, party committee, political action committee or political committee may not accept a campaign contribution from an out-of-State political action committee if the political action committee's home state has less restrictive disclosure laws than this Commonwealth, except as provided under paragraph (2).(2) A candidate, candidate committee, party committee, political action committee or political committee may accept a 20250HB0542PN0538 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 campaign contribution from an out-of-State political action committee if that political action committee is registered in this Commonwealth with the Department of State and, by the registration, has affirmed that the contributor will comply with the contribution, expenditure and reporting requirements of this act, and the regulations relating to contributions, expenditures and reporting promulgated under this act by the Department of State and the State Ethics Commission.(3) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall list and certify those states that have less restrictive disclosure laws than the Commonwealth. The list shall be compiled and updated annually and transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin not later than January 1, 2024, and each January 1 thereafter. The list shall be made available on the Department of State's publicly accessible Internet website and provided in hard copy in campaign committee packets prepared by the Department of State.(m) This section shall apply to any contribution made for the purpose of influencing an election to any public office in this Commonwealth except Federal offices.(n) For purposes of this section, any contribution made to a candidate in a year other than the calendar year in which the election is held with respect to which the contribution is made shall be considered to be made during the calendar year in which the election is held.(o) For purposes of this section, contribution limits shall apply to each election separately unless an annual limit or other limit is specified.(p) A person who has a fiduciary contract for services with 20250HB0542PN0538 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the General Assembly may not engage in campaign finance activity for candidates of the General Assembly, including making of contributions, fundraising activities or involvement in political action committees or candidate political committees.(q) Nothing under this section shall prohibit a municipality, including a city of the first class, from instituting lower limitations on contributions to candidates for elected offices under the municipality's jurisdiction.(r) A violation of the contribution limits under this section shall subject the violator to a fine equal to three times the amount of money that exceeds the limits. The penalty shall apply to both the person making the contribution and the person receiving it.(s) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall biennially adjust to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100) the limits in subsections (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g) and (h) by the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index and transmit the new amounts to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. For the purposes of this subsection, "Consumer Price Index" means the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers that is published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.(t) The limitations imposed under this section may not apply to contributions from a candidate's personal resources to a candidate committee, political committee or political action committee acting on behalf of the candidate, except that, if the contributions total one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or more, regardless of the time period over which the contributions are made, the contribution limits under this section shall 20250HB0542PN0538 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 quadruple.Section 7. Sections 1630 and 1632(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 1630. Residual Funds.--(a) In the event that a candidate or political committee terminates its financial activity as such, then the disbursement of any residual funds remaining in such an account shall be made in the following manner:(1) any such funds may be used for any expenditure as defined by this article; [and](2) may be returned, pro rata, to the contributors by the candidate or treasurer of the political committee[. A final report must be made by the next January 31 in accordance with section 1627.]; or(3) may be donated to a nonprofit organization.(b) A final report must be made by the next January 31 in accordance with section 1627.(c) For purposes of this section:(1) "Affiliated" means serving as an officer of, on the board of directors of, as a paid employee of or a contractor of a nonprofit organization.(2) "Family member" means a spouse or child.(3) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization that is qualified by the Internal Revenue Service as meeting the requirements of 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)(relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) organized under the laws of this Commonwealth and is not affiliated with a candidate or the chairman or treasurer of a political committee, including a family member of the candidate, chairman or treasurer.Section 1632. Late Filing Fee; Certificate of Filing.--20250HB0542PN0538 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) A late filing fee for each report or statement of expenditures and contributions which is not filed within the prescribed period shall be imposed as follows. Such fee shall be [ten dollars ($10)] twenty dollars ($20) for each day or part of a day excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays that a report is overdue. An additional fee of ten dollars ($10) is due for each of the first six (6) days that a report is overdue. [The maximum fee payable with respect to a single report is two hundred fifty dollars ($250).] A supervisor shall receive an overdue report or statement even if any late filing fee due has not been paid but the report or statement shall not be considered filed until all fees have been paid upon the receipt by the supervisor of an overdue report. No further late filing fees shall be incurred once the report or statement is filed notwithstanding the fact that the report or statement is not considered filed. The late filing fee is the personal liability of the candidate or treasurer of a political committee and cannot be paid from contributions to the candidate or committee, nor may such fee be considered an expenditure. A report or statement of expenditures and contributions shall be deemed to have been filed within the prescribed time if the letter transmitting the report or statement which is received by the supervisor is transmitted by first class mail and is postmarked by the United States Postal Service on the day prior to the final day on which the report or statement is to be received: Provided, That this sentence shall not be applicable to the reporting requirements contained in section 1628. All Department of State filing and disclosure requirements for prior campaign activity must have been met in order for a candidate to obtain a place on the ballot.* * *20250HB0542PN0538 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 8. Section 1633(a) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1633. Contributions or Expenditures by National Banks, Corporations or Unincorporated Associations.--(a) It is unlawful for any National or State bank, partnership or any corporation, incorporated under the laws of this or any other state or any foreign country or any unincorporated association, except those corporations formed primarily for political purposes or as a political committee, to make a contribution or expenditure in connection with the election of any candidate or for any political purpose whatever except in connection with any question to be voted on by the electors of this Commonwealth. Furthermore, it shall be unlawful for any candidate, political committee, or other person to knowingly accept or receive any contribution prohibited by this section, or for any officer or any director of any corporation, bank, or any unincorporated association to consent to any contribution or expenditure by the corporation, bank or unincorporated association, as the case may be, prohibited by this section. If any portion of this section regarding bans on contributions or expenditures by National banks, corporations or unincorporated associations is nullified by a court decision, the contribution limits established for individuals under section 1627.1 shall also be applied to the entities currently covered under this section.* * *(e) (1) A foreign-influenced corporation may not make an independent expenditure, an electioneering communication expenditure or a contribution to an independent expenditure political action committee.(2) A corporation that makes an independent expenditure, an 20250HB0542PN0538 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electioneering communication expenditure or a contribution to an independent expenditure political action committee shall, within seven (7) business days after making the expenditure or contribution, file with the Department of State a statement of certification, signed by the chief executive officer under penalty of perjury, avowing that, after due inquiry, the corporation was not a foreign-influenced corporation on the date the expenditure or contribution was made.Section 9. Section 1638 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1638. Advertising.--* * *(c) (1) Unless the person making an independent expenditure or electioneering communication, transmitted through paid radio, television or Internet advertising, has received a statement of certification as prescribed under section 1633(e) from each contributing corporation that is among the top five (5) contributors when ranked in order of amount of contribution made to the person for the twelve-month period immediately preceding the date of the communication, the advertisement shall include the following statement:Some of the funds used to pay for this message may have been provided by foreign-influenced corporations.(2) The person making the independent expenditure or electioneering communication under this section shall be entitled to rely on the statement of certification provided by the contributor unless the person has actual knowledge that the certification is false.Section 10. Section 1641(a) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:20250HB0542PN0538 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1641. Reports by Business Entities; Publication by Secretary of the Commonwealth.--(a) Any business entity including but not limited to a corporation, company, association, partnership or sole proprietorship, which has been awarded [non-bid] contracts or grants over fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) from the Commonwealth or its political subdivisions during the preceding [calendar year] two-year period, shall report by February 15 of each year to the Secretary of the Commonwealth a list including the amount of the contract, description of the service provided and location and an itemized list of all political contributions known to the business entity by virtue of the knowledge possessed by every officer, director, associate, partner, limited partner or individual owner that has been made by:(1) any officer, director, associate, partner, limited partner, individual owner or members of their immediate family when the contributions exceed an aggregate of one thousand dollars ($1,000) by any individual during the preceding year; or(2) any employe or members of his immediate family whose aggregate political [contribution] contributions exceeded one thousand dollars ($1,000) during the preceding year.For the purposes of this subsection, "immediate family" [means a person's spouse and any unemancipated child] shall have the same meaning as in 65 Pa.C.S. § 13A03 (relating to definitions).* * *(c) The Department of State, in consultation with the Department of General Services, shall publish a list of all business entities, corporations, companies, associations, partnerships or sole proprietorships receiving grants and contracts in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) from the 20250HB0542PN0538 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth not later than January 31 of each year for the preceding two-year period. The list shall be updated quarterly.Section 11. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1643. Independent Expenditures.--(a) Except as prohibited under section 1633(e)(1), a person may make independent expenditures.(b) The following shall apply to expenditures made for a written, typed or other printed communication or an Internet-based, written communication which promotes the success or defeat of a candidate's campaign for nomination or election or the adoption or defeat of a ballot question or solicits funds to benefit a political committee:(1) A person may not make, incur or contract for an expenditure with the consent of, in coordination with or in consultation with a candidate, candidate committee, political committee or candidate's agent.(2) A group of two or more individuals acting together that receives funds or makes or incurs expenditures not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) in the aggregate which have not formed a political committee may not make or incur an independent expenditure.(c) Communications under subsection (b) shall contain the following language:(1) The words "paid for and approved by" and one of the following:(i) For an individual, the name and address of the individual.(ii) For a committee other than a party committee, the name of the committee and its campaign treasurer.(iii) For a party committee, the name of the committee.20250HB0542PN0538 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) For a group of two or more individuals that received funds or makes or incurs expenditures not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) in the aggregate which have not formed a political committee, the name of the group and the name and address of its agent.(2) The words "approved by" and one of the following:(i) For an individual, group or political committee other than a candidate committee making or incurring an expenditure with the consent of, in coordination with or in consultation with a candidate committee or candidate's agent, the name of the candidate.(ii) For a candidate committee, the name of the candidate.(d) The following shall apply to independent expenditures:(1) A person may not make or incur an independent expenditure for a written, typed or other printed communication or an Internet-based written communication which promotes the success or defeat of a candidate for nomination or election or promotes or opposes a political party or solicits funds to benefit a political party or committee, unless the communication bears upon its face the words "paid for and approved by" and the name of the person, the name of its chief executive officer or equivalent and its principal business address and the words "This message was made independently of a candidate or political party."(2) An entity which is a tax-exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. Ch. 1 Subch. F (relating to exempt organizations) , making or incurring an independent expenditure under clause (1), shall also bear upon the face of the communication the words "Top Five Contributors" followed by a list of the five (5)persons making the largest contributions to the organization 20250HB0542PN0538 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 during the twelve-month period before the date of the communication.(3) Disclosure requirements are as follows:(i) In addition to the requirements of clauses (1) and (2), a person may not make or incur an independent expenditure for television advertising, radio or Internet video advertising or Internet radio advertising that promotes the success or defeat of a candidate for election or promotes or opposes a political party or solicits funds to benefit a political party or committee, unless at the end of the advertisement there appears or includes simultaneously for a period of no less than four seconds a clear identifiable audio, video, photographic or similar image of the person's chief executive officer or equivalent and a personal audio message, in the following form:I am . . . (name of person's chief executive officer or equivalent), . . . (title) of . . . (entity). This message was made independently of any candidate, political committee or political party, and I approve of its content.(ii) A tax-exempt organization under 26 U.S.C. Ch. 1 Subch. F , making or incurring an independent expenditure under subclause (i), shall include on the advertisement an easily readable written message in the following form:"The Top Five Contributors to the organization for this advertisement are" followed by a list of the five (5) persons making the largest contributions to the organization during the twelve-month period before the date of the communication.Section 1644. Independent Expenditure Evaluation.--(a) When the Bureau of Commissions, Elections and Legislation audits and evaluates an expenditure that is included in a report under section 1643 to determine whether the 20250HB0542PN0538 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expenditure is an independent expenditure, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the following expenditures are not independent expenditures:(1) An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation or concert with, at the request, suggestion or direction of or pursuant to a general or particular understanding with a candidate or political committee or other agent acting on behalf of a candidate or political committee.(2) An expenditure made by a person for the production, dissemination, distribution or publication, in whole or in substantial part, of a broadcast or a written, graphic or other form of political advertising or campaign communications prepared by a candidate or political committee or a consultant or other agent acting on behalf of a candidate or political committee.(3) An expenditure made by a person based on information about a candidate's or political committee's plans, projects or needs, provided by a candidate or political committee or a consultant or other agent acting on behalf of a candidate or political committee with the intent that the expenditure be made.(4) An expenditure made by an individual who, in the same election cycle, is serving or has served as the campaign chairman, campaign treasurer or deputy treasurer of a political committee benefiting from the expenditure, or another executive or policymaking position, including as a member, employe, fundraiser, consultant or other agent acting on behalf of a candidate or political committee.(5) An expenditure made by a person whose officer, director, member, employe, fundraiser, consultant or other agent who 20250HB0542PN0538 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 serves the person in an executive or policymaking position also serves as or has served in the same election cycle as the candidate or the campaign chairman, campaign treasurer or deputy treasurer of a candidate or political committee benefiting from the expenditure, or in another executive or policymaking position of the candidate or political committee.(6) An expenditure made by a person for:(i) fundraising activities with or for a candidate or political committee or a consultant or other agent acting on behalf of a candidate or political committee; or(ii) the solicitation or receipt of contributions on behalf of a candidate or political committee or a consultant or other agent acting on behalf of a candidate or political committee.(7) An expenditure made by a person based on information about a candidate's campaign plans, projects or needs, that is directly or indirectly provided by a candidate, the candidate's committee or a political committee or a consultant or other agent acting on behalf of the candidate or political committee to the person making the expenditure or the person's agent, with an express or tacit understanding that the person is considering making the expenditure.(8) An expenditure made by a person for a communication that clearly identifies a candidate or political committee during an election campaign if the person making the expenditure or the person's agent has informed the candidate who benefits from the expenditure that the candidate or political committee or a consultant or other agent acting on behalf of the benefiting candidate or political committee concerning the communications content, or of the intended audience, timing, location or mode or frequency of the dissemination.20250HB0542PN0538 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (9) An expenditure made by a person or an entity for consultant or creative services, including services related to communications strategy or design or campaign strategy, to be used to promote or oppose a candidate's election to office if the provision of these services is also providing consultant or creative services to the candidate or to an opposing candidate in the same election.(b) As used in this section, the words "agent acting on behalf of a candidate" include:(1) an individual or a person paid by a candidate or a candidate committee; and(2) any consultant, printing firm, media production company, Internet website director or webmaster, marketing firm, advertising firm, filed organization firm or other company or firm retained by a candidate or authorized by a candidate or a candidate committee to act on the candidate's behalf.Section 12. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVI-B CORPORATE POLITICAL ACCOUNTABILITYSection 1601-B . Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Contribution" or "expenditure." As follows:(1) The term includes:(i) Any monetary and nonmonetary political contributions and expenditures not deductible under 26 U.S.C. § 162(e)(1)(B) (relating to trade or business expenses) , including: (A) Contributions to or expenditures on behalf 20250HB0542PN0538 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of political candidates, political parties, political committees and other entities organized and operating under 26 U.S.C. Ch. 1 Subch. F (relating to exempt organizations) . (B) Any portion of any dues or similar payments made to any tax-exempt organization that is used for an expenditure or contribution if, made directly by the corporation would not be deductible under 26 U.S.C. § 162(e)(1)(B) . (C) Any contribution or expenditure, as those terms are defined in 52 U.S.C. § 30101(8)(A) and (9) (A) (relating to definitions) . (D) Any contribution or expenditure defined under this act.(ii) Any direct or indirect payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit or gift of money, or any services, or anything of value, except a loan of money by a National or State bank made in accordance with the applicable banking laws and regulations and in the ordinary course of business, to any candidate, campaign committee or political party or organization, in connection with any election to any office.(2) The term does not include:(i) Communications by a corporation to its stockholders and executive or administrative personnel and their families or by a labor organization to its members and their families on any subject.(ii) Nonpartisan registration and get-out-the-vote campaigns by a corporation aimed at its stockholders and executive or administrative personnel and their families 20250HB0542PN0538 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or by a labor organization aimed at its members and their families.(iii) The establishment, administration and solicitation of contributions to a separate segregated fund to be utilized for political purposes by a corporation, labor organization, membership organization, cooperative or corporation without capital stock."Corporate treasury funds." Money in possession of a corporation incorporated under the laws of this Commonwealth in the normal course of business, including funds from sales, accounts payable, loans, investments, bonds or debt instruments."Corporation." The term includes any company, trade or professional union, not-for-profit association and incorporated partnership organized as an incorporated entity under the laws of any state."Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."Issue advocacy campaign." Contributions or expenditures for any communication to the general public intended to encourage the public to contact a government official regarding pending legislation, public policy or a government rule or regulation. The term does not include contributions or expenditures for registered lobbyists or other persons employed by the corporation to lobby directly Federal or State government officials."Known at the time of the authorization vote." At the time the corporation seeks authorization from shareholders to spend corporate funds for political activities:(1) the corporation's officers, directors or employees have identified a specific political activity for the corporation to support or oppose;20250HB0542PN0538 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) corporate officers, directors or employees have taken steps to obligate funds to a political activity; or(3) the corporation has a regularly scheduled payment to a trade association or other entity to pay for a political activity in the next 12 months."Majority of shareholders." Fifty percent plus one of all outstanding voting securities. Shareholders not casting votes shall not count toward affirmative authorization under this article."Political activities." Any contributions or expenditures made directly or indirectly to, or in support of or opposition to, any candidate, political party, committee, electioneering communication, ballot measure campaign or an issue advocacy campaign. The term does not include activities defined as lobbying under any Federal, State or local law."Separate segregated fund." A political action committee formed by a corporation for the purpose of making contributions to candidates for office or to political parties. A separate segregated fund which supports Federal candidates shall have the same meaning as in 52 U.S.C. § 30118 (relating to contributions or expenditures by national banks, corporations, or labor organizations) . Section 1602-B . Shareholder vote on corporate political activities.(a) Annual vote.--(1) Any corporation incorporated in this Commonwealth that spends in the aggregate $10,000 or more of corporate treasury funds on all political activities in this Commonwealth must comply with the requirements of this section.20250HB0542PN0538 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Any proxy or consent or authorization for an annual meeting of the shareholders of a corporation incorporated in this Commonwealth, or a special meeting in lieu of the meeting, if proxies are solicited in respect of any security occurring on or after six months following the date on which final regulations are published under subsection (d) shall provide for a separate resolution subject to shareholder vote to approve any spending of $10,000 or more by the corporation for any political activity.(3) Notwithstanding the requirement for an annual shareholder vote to authorize any spending of $10,000 or more by the corporation for any political activity, a corporation may request authorization for spending on political activities on a more frequent basis. Any authorization request by the corporation that is not made during an annual authorization shall be deemed a special authorization.(4) If a corporation spends less than an aggregate of $10,000 in a 12-month period for political activities, it shall not be required to seek shareholder authorization for the spending.(b) Shareholder approval.--(1) When seeking shareholder authorization for expenditures for political activities, the corporation shall request the authority to spend a maximum dollar amount in the next 12 months.(2) If known at the time of the authorization vote, the company shall articulate whether the corporate treasury funds so authorized are intended to benefit or defeat specific candidates, ballot measures or issue advocacy campaigns or whether it will be paid to specific nonprofits or trade 20250HB0542PN0538 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 associations for political activities.(3) To be effective, an authorization vote must garner support from a majority of shareholders.(4) A vote by the shareholders to approve or disapprove any spending of $10,000 or more by a corporation for a political activity shall be binding on the corporation.(5) Notwithstanding the requirement for an annual shareholder vote to authorize any spending of $10,000 or more by the corporation for any political activity, a corporation may request a special authorization for additional spending on political activities, provided that:(i) all spending on political activities of $10,000 or more must be authorized by a shareholder majority vote; and(ii) for any special authorization, the company shall articulate whether the corporate treasury funds so authorized are intended to benefit or defeat candidates, ballot measures or issue advocacy campaigns or will be paid to specific nonprofits or trade associations for political activities at the time the special authorization is requested.(c) Director liability.--If a corporation makes an unauthorized contribution or expenditure for a political activity, the directors at the time that the unauthorized contribution or expenditure was incurred are jointly and severally liable to repay to the corporation the amount of the unauthorized expenditure, with interest at the rate of 8% per year.(d) Rulemaking.--The department shall promulgate final regulations to implement this section no later than six months 20250HB0542PN0538 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 after the effective date of this section.(e) Sole proprietorships excluded.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply a new duty to the owner of a sole proprietorship.Section 1603-B . Notification to shareholders of corporate political activities.(a) Notification to shareholders.--(1) At least quarterly during each fiscal year, a corporation incorporated in this Commonwealth that makes contributions or expenditures for political activities must notify its shareholders and the department in writing of the nature of all its political activities, funded by either its separate segregated fund or through its general corporate treasury, including contributions or expenditures made directly or indirectly.(2) A report made under this section shall include the following:(i) The date of the contributions or expenditures.(ii) The amount of the contributions or expenditures.(iii) The identity of the candidate, political party, committee, electioneering communication, ballot measure campaign or issue advocacy campaign.(iv) If the contributions or expenditures were made for or against a candidate, including an electioneering communication as defined under Federal law, the office sought by the candidate and the political party affiliation of the candidate.(v) If the contributions or expenditures were made for or against a ballot measure, the purpose of the 20250HB0542PN0538 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 measure and whether the contributions or expenditures were made in support of or opposition to the ballot measure.(vi) If the contributions or expenditures were made for or against an issue advocacy campaign, the nature of the political issue and whether the contributions were made in support of or opposition to the political issue.(vii) All independent expenditures made by a separate segregated fund affiliated with the corporation.(b) Public disclosure.--(1) The quarterly reports of political activities by a corporation incorporated in this Commonwealth to shareholders shall be public records.(2) A copy of the reports filed under subsection (a)(1) shall be:(i) submitted to the department; and(ii) posted for at least one year on the corporation's publicly accessible Internet website, if any.Section 1604-B . Public disclosure of corporate political activities by department.(a) Department duty.--The quarterly reports of political activities by a corporation incorporated in this Commonwealth to shareholders shall be made publicly available by the department.(b) Electronic form.--A quarterly report required to be filed under this section shall be filed in electronic form using filing software approved or developed by the department in addition to filing in any other form that the department may require by regulation and shall be published on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.20250HB0542PN0538 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Format.--The department shall ensure that, to the greatest extent practicable, the quarterly reports on political activities are publicly available through the department's publicly accessible Internet website in a format that can be searched, sorted and downloaded.Section 1605-B . Report by Department of the Auditor General. (a) Audit.--On an annual basis, the Department of the Auditor General shall audit the extent of compliance or noncompliance with the requirements of this article by corporations incorporated under the laws of this Commonwealth, their management and shareholders, and the effectiveness of the department in meeting the reporting and disclosure requirements of this article.(b) Report.--No later than April 1 of each year, the Department of the Auditor General shall submit to the Governor a report on the review required by subsection (a) for the preceding year.Section 1606-B . Board approval for all corporate political expenditures.(a) Approval required.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a corporation or trade, business or professional association may not make any campaign contribution or expenditure unless specifically authorized to do so:(1) by the vote of the board of directors of the corporation or of the executive committee of the trade, business or professional association at a regular or special meeting of the board of directors or the executive committee;(2) by the president, vice president, secretary or treasurer of a corporation whom the board has specifically empowered to authorize the contributions or expenditures; or20250HB0542PN0538 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) for a corporation, by any other person designated by resolution of the board of directors of a corporation to authorize contributions or expenditures.(b) Form of contribution.--A corporation, trade, business or professional association may not make any contribution or expenditure as defined under Federal or State law, other than an in-kind contribution or expenditure, except by check.Section 1607-B . Applicability to foreign corporations. (a) Foreign corporations.--A foreign corporation, other than a foreign association or foreign nonprofit corporation, including a foreign parent corporation even though it does not itself transact intrastate business, shall be subject to the requirements of sections 1602-B, 1603-B, 1604-B and 1605-B if:(1) the average of property, payroll and sales factors, as provided under section 401 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, with respect to the foreign corporation, is more than 50% during its latest full-income year; and(2) more than one-half of its outstanding voting securities are held of record by persons having addresses in this Commonwealth appearing on the books of the corporation on the record date for the latest meeting of shareholders held during its latest full-income year or, if no meeting was held during that year, on the last day of the latest full-income year.(b) Determination.--(1) The determination of the property, payroll and sales factors under subsection (a) with respect to any parent corporation shall be made on a consolidated basis, including in a unitary computation, after elimination of intercompany 20250HB0542PN0538 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transactions, the property, payroll and sales of the parent and all of its subsidiaries in which it owns directly or indirectly more than 50% of the outstanding shares entitled to vote for the election of directors, but deducting a percentage of the property, payroll and sales of any subsidiary equal to the percentage minority ownership, if any, in the subsidiary.(2) Except as provided under paragraph (3), for the purpose of this section, any securities held to the knowledge of the issuer in the names of broker-dealers, nominees for broker-dealers, including clearing corporations or banks, associations or other entities holding securities in a nominee name or otherwise on behalf of a beneficial owner, collectively nominee holders, shall not be considered outstanding.(3) If a foreign corporation requests all nominee holders to certify, with respect to all beneficial owners for whom securities are held, the number of shares held for the beneficial owners having addresses as shown on the records of the nominee holder in this Commonwealth and outside of this Commonwealth, all shares certified in this manner shall be considered outstanding and held of record by persons having addresses either in this Commonwealth or outside of this Commonwealth as certified in this manner, if the certification provided is retained with the record of shareholders and made available for inspection and copying.(4) A current list of beneficial owners of a foreign corporation's securities provided to the corporation by one or more nominee holders or agents thereof under the requirements of 17 CFR 240.14b-1(b)(3) (relating to 20250HB0542PN0538 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 obligation of registered brokers and dealers in connection with the prompt forwarding of certain communications to beneficial owners) or 240.14b-2(b)(3) (relating to obligation of banks, associations and other entities that exercise fiduciary powers in connection with the prompt forwarding of certain communications to beneficial owners) promulgated under 15 U.S.C. Ch. 2B (relating to securities exchanges) shall constitute an acceptable certification with respect to beneficial owners for the purposes of this subsection.(c) Applicability.--This section shall not apply to any corporation:(1) With outstanding securities listed on the New York Stock Exchange or the American Stock Exchange.(2) With outstanding securities designated as qualified for trading on the Nasdaq Global Market of the Nasdaq Stock Market, or any successor to the Nasdaq Global Market of the Nasdaq Stock Market.(3) With all of its voting shares, other than directors' qualifying shares, owned directly or indirectly by a corporation not subject to this section.(d) Liability.--If a party obtains a final determination by a court of competent jurisdiction that a corporation failed to provide to the party information required to be provided by this article or provided the party information of the kind required to be provided by this article that is incorrect, a court, in its discretion, may include in its judgment recovery by the party from the corporation of court costs and reasonable attorney fees incurred in the legal proceeding to the extent that the court costs and reasonable attorney fees relate to obtaining the final determination.20250HB0542PN0538 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 13. The dollar figures contained in section 1627.1 of the act shall be adjusted biennially at a rate determined by the Federal Election Commission as authorized under 11 CFR 110. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall certify the calculation of the rate as determined by the Federal Election Commission and shall transmit notice of the new dollar figures to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 14. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 15. A comprehensive, fully searchable and user-friendly computerized database to track full implementation of this act shall be made available to the public by the Department of State through its publicly accessible Internet website within 90 days.Section 16. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB0542PN0538 - 45 - 1234567891011121314151617181920